Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6607
Home health agency; provide supervision; care plan.

The home health agency shall provide supervision of home health aides by a Nebraska-licensed registered nurse.

Supervision of home health aide services consisting of personal care, assistance with activities of daily living, and measuring vital signs, if such measurements are taken at the request of the patient and are not required pursuant to the nursing care plan, shall include, at a minimum, an onsite visit to each patient, with or without the home health aide being present, once every sixty-two days and an onsite visit to observe each home health aide providing care and assistance and measuring vital signs once every six months.

Except for measuring vital signs at the request of the patient when such measurements are not required pursuant to the nursing care plan, supervision of home health aide services for basic therapeutic care shall include at a minimum an onsite visit to each patient, with or without the health aide being present, once every two weeks.

A care plan for home health aide services shall be developed for each patient by a Nebraska-licensed registered nurse and reviewed by the registered nurse as required by the patient's current condition or at least every sixty-two days.

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 122;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 58.